West Virginia, session 2026, HB4594.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: CHAPTER 5B. ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT ACT OF 1985. ARTICLE 2B. WEST VIRGINIA WORKFORCE INVESTMENT ACT. §5B-2B-1. Short title. [Repealed.] §5B-2B-2. Definitions. [Repealed.] §5B-2B-3. West Virginia Workforce Development Board; membership of board; meetings; quorum requirements. [Repealed.] §5B-2B-4. Duties of the Workforce Development Board. [Repealed.] §5B-2B-4b. Open meetings; public information. [Repealed.] §5B-2B-5. State agencies. [Repealed.] §5B-2B-6. Administration of board. [Repealed.] §5B-2B-8. Powers and duties of the commission. [Repealed.] §5B-2B-9. Coordination between agencies providing workforce investment programs, local workforce investment boards and the Executive Director of Workforce West Virginia. [Repealed.] CHAPTER 5F. REORGANIZATION OF THE EXECUTIVE BRANCH OF STATE GOVERNMENT. ARTICLE 1. GENERAL PROVISIONS. §5F-1-2. Executive departments created; offices of secretary created. (a) There are created, within the executive branch of the state government, the following departments:(1) Department of Administration;(2) Department of Environmental Protection;(3) Department of Health; (4) Department of Homeland Security;(5) Department of Revenue;(6) Department of Transportation;(7) Department of Commerce; (8) Department of Veterans' Assistance; (9) Department of Tourism; (10) Department of Human Services; and(11) Department of Health Facilities; and(12) Department of Workforce Services.(b) Each department will be headed by a secretary appointed by the Governor with the advice and consent of the Senate. Each secretary serves at the will and pleasure of the Governor. ARTICLE 2. TRANSFER OF AGENCIES AND BOARDS. §5F-2-1a. Termination of the department of health and human resources; transfer and incorporation of agencies and boards legislative intent; creation of new departments. (a) It is the intent of the Legislature to devolve the functions of the Department of Health and Human Resources into three new and separate departments of the executive branch as provided in this Act over a period of transition that concludes with the termination of the Department of Health and Human Resources.  It is the intent of the Legislature that the provisions of this Act be construed to achieve the restructuring and reallocation of the powers, duties and functions of the Department of Health and Human Resources to the three new departments created in this section in an orderly manner designed to maintain the delivery of services that have heretofore been provided by the Department of Health and Human Resources by the new departments during the transition and beyond the termination of the Department of Health and Human Resources without disruption and to streamline and, where possible, to share administrative and operative expenses where common to each of the new departments.  To that end, the Secretary of the Department of Health and Human Resources, the Secretary of the Department of Human Services, the Secretary of the Department of Health and the Secretary of the Department of Health Facilities shall enter into a memorandum of understanding to effect the provisions of this Act that shall, at a minimum, create a Office of Shared Administration mutually administered by the secretaries that shall coordinate efforts with the Department of Administration to maximize efficiencies and function of services in an effort to contain expenses within the Department of Human Services, the Department of Health and the Department of Health Facilities.  The Office of Shared Administration shall implement a plan to maximize function and efficiency administrative services for the purpose of streamlining administrative services and reducing expenses within the departments.  The Office of Shared Administration shall complete implementation by June 30, 2024, and shall provide quarterly updates to the Legislative Oversight Commission on Health and Human Resources Accountability.(b) The Department of Human Services created under §5F-1-2 of this code is a separate and distinct department of the executive branch. The following agencies and boards, including all of the allied, advisory, affiliated, or related entities and funds associated with any agency or board, are transferred to, incorporated in and administered as a part of the Department of Human Services:(1) Bureau for Social Services;(2) Bureau for Medical Services; (3) Bureau for Child Support Enforcement;(4) Bureau for Family Assistance; (5) (4) Bureau for Behavioral Health; and(6) (5) Any other agency or entity hereinafter established within the Department of Human Services by an act of the Legislature.(c) (1) The Department of Health created under §5F-1-2 of this code is a separate and distinct department of the executive branch. The following agencies and boards, including all of the allied, advisory, affiliated, or related entities and funds associated with any agency or board, are transferred to, incorporated in and administered as a part of the Department of Health:(A) Bureau for Public Health;(B) Office of Emergency Medical Services; (C) Office of the Chief Medical Examiner;(D) Center for Threat Preparedness;(E) Health Care Authority; and(F) Any other agency or entity hereinafter established within the Department of Health by an act of the Legislature.(2) The Office of the Inspector General is a separate and autonomous agency within the Department of Health as provided in §16B-2-1.  The following agencies and boards, including all of the allied, advisory, affiliated, or related entities and funds associated with any agency or board, are transferred to, incorporated in and administered as a part of the Office of the Inspector General. The Office of the Inspector General, shall include:(A) Office of Health Facility Licensure and Certification;(B) Board of Review;(C) Foster Care Ombudsman;(D) Olmstead Office;(E) Investigations and Fraud Management;(F) Quality Control; (G) Mental Health Ombudsman;(H) WV Clearance for Access: Registry and Employment Screening; and(I) Human Rights Commission.(d) The Department of Health Facilities created under §5F-1-2 of this code is a separate and distinct department of the executive branch. The following state facilities, including all of the allied, advisory, affiliated, or related entities and funds associated with any state facility, are transferred to, incorporated in and administered as a part of the Department of Health Facilities:(1) Hopemont Hospital;(2) Jackie Withrow Hospital;(3) John Manchin, Sr. Health Care Center;(4) Lakin Hospital;(5) Mildred Mitchell-Bateman Hospital;(6) Welch Community Hospital; (7) William R. Sharpe Jr. Hospital; and(8) Any other agency or entity hereinafter established within the Department of Health Facilities by an act of the Legislature.(e) Any secretary may recommend that a bureau, office, board, commission or other state entity be included or excluded from the organization of the departments created in this section to the Joint Committee on Government and Finance and the Legislative Commission on Health and Human Resources Accountability. (f) All programs, orders, determinations, rules, permits, grants, contracts, certificates, bonds, authorizations and privileges which have been issued, promulgated, made, granted or allowed to become pursuant to authority provided by this code to the Department of Health and Human Resources or the Secretary of that Department that are in effect on the dates of the creation of the new departments as provided in this section shall continue in effect according to their terms until modified, terminated, superseded, set aside or revoked by the department or secretary that assumes authority over the subject matter of the same under the provisions of this Act. CHAPTER 6. GENERAL PROVISIONS RESPECTING OFFICERS. ARTICLE 7. COMPENSATION AND ALLOWANCES. §6-7-2a. Terms of certain appointive state officers; appointment; qualifications; powers and salaries of officers. (a) Each of the following appointive state officers named in this subsection shall be appointed by the Governor, by and with the advice and consent of the Senate. Each of the appointive state officers serves at the will and pleasure of the Governor for the term for which the Governor was elected and until the respective state officers’ successors have been appointed and qualified. Each of the appointive state officers are subject to the existing qualifications for holding each respective office and each has and is hereby granted all of the powers and authority and shall perform all of the functions and services heretofore vested in and performed by virtue of existing law respecting each office.The annual salary of each named appointive state officer is as follows:Commissioner, Division of Highways, $92,500; Commissioner, Division of Corrections and Rehabilitation, $90,000; Director, Division of Natural Resources, $75,000; Superintendent, State Police, $85,000; Commissioner, Division of Financial Institutions, $75,000; Commissioner, Division of Culture and History, $65,000; Commissioner, Alcohol Beverage Control Commission, $75,000; Commissioner, Division of Motor Vehicles, $75,000; Director, Human Rights Commission, $55,000; Commissioner, Division of Labor, $70,000; Chairperson, Board of Parole, $55,000; members, Board of Parole, $50,000; and members, Employment Security Review Board, $17,000. and Commissioner, Workforce West Virginia, $75,000. Secretaries of the departments shall be paid an annual salary as follows: Health and Human Resources, $95,000: Provided, That effective July 1, 2013, the Secretary of the Department of Human Services, the Secretary of the Department of Health, and the Secretary of the Department of Health Facilities shall be paid an annual salary not to exceed $175,000; Transportation, $95,000: Provided, however, That if the same person is serving as both the Secretary of Transportation and the Commissioner of Highways, he or she shall be paid $120,000; Revenue, $95,000; Military Affairs and Public Safety, $95,000; Administration, $95,000; Education and the Arts, $95,000; Commerce, $95,000; Veterans’ Assistance, $95,000; and Environmental Protection, $95,000; and Workforce Services, $95,000: Provided further, That any officer specified in this subsection whose salary is increased by more than $5,000 as a result of the amendment and reenactment of this section during the 2011 regular session of the Legislature shall be paid the salary increase in increments of $5,000 per fiscal year beginning July 1, 2011, up to the maximum salary provided in this subsection.(b) Each of the state officers named in this subsection shall continue to be appointed in the manner prescribed in this code and shall be paid an annual salary as follows:Director, Board of Risk and Insurance Management, $80,000; Director, Division of Rehabilitation Services, $70,000; Director, Division of Personnel, $70,000; Executive Director, Educational Broadcasting Authority, $75,000; Secretary, Library Commission, $72,000; Director, Geological and Economic Survey, $75,000; Executive Director, Prosecuting Attorneys Institute, $80,000; Executive Director, Public Defender Services, $70,000; Commissioner, Bureau of Senior Services, $75,000; Executive Director, Women’s Commission, $45,000; Director, Hospital Finance Authority, $35,000; member, Racing Commission, $12,000; Chairman, Public Service Commission, $85,000; members, Public Service Commission, $85,000; Director, Division of Forestry, $75,000; and Executive Director of the Health Care Authority, $80,000.(c) Each of the following appointive state officers named in this subsection shall be appointed by the Governor, by and with the advice and consent of the Senate. Each of the appointive state officers serves at the will and pleasure of the Governor for the term for which the Governor was elected and until the respective state officers’ successors have been appointed and qualified. Each of the appointive state officers are subject to the existing qualifications for holding each respective office and each has and is hereby granted all of the powers and authority and shall perform all of the functions and services heretofore vested in and performed by virtue of existing law respecting each office.The annual salary of each named appointive state officer shall be as follows:Commissioner, State Tax Division, $92,500; Insurance Commissioner, $92,500; Lottery Director, $110,000; Director, Division of Homeland Security and Emergency Management, $65,000; and Adjutant General, $125,000.(d) No increase in the salary of any appointive state officer pursuant to this section may be paid until and unless the appointive state officer has first filed with the State Auditor and the Legislative Auditor a sworn statement, on a form to be prescribed by the Attorney General, certifying that his or her spending unit is in compliance with any general law providing for a salary increase for his or her employees. The Attorney General shall prepare and distribute the form to the affected spending units.(e) The annual salary of each appointive state officer named in this section shall continue in the amount as set forth in this section from the effective date of the amendments to this section enacted in 2020, until the position held by the officer is vacated or until July 1, 2020, whichever occurs first. After the vacancy or after July 1, 2020, whichever occurs first, unless otherwise prohibited by law, the annual salary of each appointed state officer named in this section shall be fixed by the Governor within the current budget allocation. In the event the annual salary fixed by the Governor for an appointed state officer named in this section exceeds the amount set forth in this section for the appointed state officer, the amount of the annual salary for the appointed state officer shall be set forth in a line-item in the budget bill, and payment of an annual salary to the appointed state officer may not exceed that amount but may be lower than the salary approved in the budget bill or established in this section. The salary of a newly appointed state officer named in this section shall be included in the appointment letter for the position.The amendment and reenactment of this section in the third extraordinary session of the Legislature, 2021, shall not operate to reduce the salary of any appointive state officer whose salary has been increased pursuant to this subsection since July 1, 2020. CHAPTER 9. HUMAN SERVICES. ARTICLE 3. APPLICATION FOR AND GRANTING OF ASSISTANCE. §9-3-1. Application for and granting of federal-state or federal assistance. [Repealed.] §9-3-2. Application for and granting of state assistance. [Repealed.] §9-3-3. Making application, investigation and grant. [Repealed.] §9-3-4. Assignment of support obligations. [Repealed.] §9-3-5. Services to persons not otherwise eligible. [Repealed.] §9-3-6.  Program for drug screening of applicants for cash assistance. [Repealed.] ARTICLE 5. MISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONS. §9-5-5. Recipients of cash grants. Within such limitations as may be imposed by applicable federal laws, rules and regulations, the department of welfare Department of Workforce Services shall make available for public inspection by the thirtieth day of each month a separate alphabetical list of the names and addresses of all persons receiving any class of welfare assistance in the form of cash grants during the preceding month, together with the amounts of such cash grants. This information shall be delivered to the clerk of each county court in the state who shall immediately file the same in his or her office with respect to persons receiving such cash grants as residents of that county. Such information shall be retained in the files of said clerks of the county courts for a period of two years from the date of receipt thereof. All information other than names, addresses and amounts of such cash grants shall be considered as confidential.It shall be unlawful, for commercial or political purposes of any nature, for any person or persons, body, association, firm, corporation or other agency to solicit, disclose, receive, make use of, or to authorize, knowingly permit, participate in, or acquiesce in the use of, any lists of names of, or any information concerning, persons applying for or receiving any class of welfare assistance, directly or indirectly derived from the records, papers, files, or communications of the department of welfare or acquired in the course of performance of official duties. The violation of this provision is a misdemeanor, punishable upon conviction, by a fine of not more than $1,000 or imprisonment of not more than six months, or both.For the protection of applicants and recipients of welfare assistance, the department Department of Workforce Services shall be required to establish reasonable rules and regulations governing the custody, use and preservation of the records, papers, files and communications of the department Department of Workforce Services. ARTICLE 8. eligibility and fraud requirements for public ASSISTANCE. §9-8-1. Definitions. [Repealed.] §9-8-2. Work requirements. [Repealed.] §9-8-3. Income and identity verification. [Repealed.] §9-8-4. Eligibility verification. [Repealed.] §9-8-5. Identity authentication. [Repealed.] §9-8-6. Case review. [Repealed.] §9-8-7. Notice and right to be heard. [Repealed.] §9-8-8. Referrals for fraud, misrepresentation or inadequate documentation. [Repealed.] §9-8-9. Reporting to the Governor and Legislature. [Repealed.] §9-8-10. Prohibitions on use of electronic benefit transfer cards. [Repealed.] §9-8-11. Tracking out-of-state spending. [Repealed.] §9-8-12. Rulemaking. [Repealed.] ARTICLE 9. WV WORKS ACT. §9-9-1. Short title. [Repealed.] §9-9-2. Legislative findings; purpose. [Repealed.] §9-9-3. Definitions. [Repealed.] §9-9-4. Authorization for program. [Repealed.] §9-9-5. WV works program fund. [Repealed.] §9-9-6. Program participation. [Repealed.] §9-9-7. Work requirements. [Repealed.] §9-9-8. Exemptions. [Repealed.] §9-9-9. Personal responsibility contract. [Repealed.] §9-9-10. Participation limitation; exceptions. [Repealed.] §9-9-11. Breach of contract; notice; sanctions. [Repealed.] §9-9-12. Diversionary assistance allowance in lieu of monthly cash assistance. [Repealed.] §9-9-13. Subsidized employment. [Repealed.] §9-9-14. Transitional assistance. [Repealed.] §9-9-15. Interagency coordination. [Repealed.] §9-9-16. Intergovernmental coordination. [Repealed.] §9-9-17. Public-private partnerships. [Repealed.] §9-9-18. Relationship with other law. [Repealed.] §9-9-19. Legislative oversight. [Repealed.] §9-9-20. Confidentiality, fines and penalties. [Repealed.] §9-9-21. West Virginia Works Separate State College Program; eligibility; special revenue account. [Repealed.] §9-9-22. West Virginia Works Separate State Two-Parent Families Program. [Repealed.] CHAPTER 18. EDUCATION. ARTICLE 5. COUNTY BOARD OF EDUCATION. §18-5-19c. Division of Technical and Adult Education Services. (a) The State Superintendent of Schools has authority to establish in the state Department of Education a Division of Technical and Adult Education Services, and to provide for suitable coordination and supervision of the educational programs established in sections nineteen-a and nineteen-b of this article §18-5-19a of this code. All programs established under those sections are under rules of the state Board of Education.(b) Transition of Personnel and Property: All personnel, equipment, records, and property primarily used for adult education within the Department of Education shall be transferred to the Department of Workforce Services on or before July 1, 2027.(b) (c) The Legislature finds that:(1) The General Educational Development (GED) exam is an implement for success that can transform the future of a graduate;(2) For an individual who has not attained a high school diploma, achieving a High School Equivalency Diploma can increase employment opportunities and earning potential;(3) Individuals who will benefit from a High School Equivalency Diploma often lack the credentials necessary for employment, and therefore lack the resources to afford the costs of the GED exam; and(4) Many individuals for whom the GED exam is unattainable are likely to remain in a state of poverty.(c) (d) The state board shall develop and administer a program to provide the GED exam fee for an eligible individual pursuing a High School Equivalency Diploma. The state board shall promulgate a rule in accordance with the provisions of article three-b, chapter twenty-nine-a of this code to implement the program.(1) The rule shall provide for eligibility requirements as follows:(A) Successful completion of a GED preparation program;(B) Successful completion of the GED Official Practice Test;(C) Standards for measuring successful completion of the program and test required by this subdivision;(D) GED exam registration with a GED testing center that is approved by the state board; and(E) Any other requirements established by the state board.(2) The state board shall provide the GED exam fee directly to the GED testing center. ARTICLE 10A. REHABILITATION SERVICES. §18-10A-2. Division of Rehabilitation Services. (a) The Division of Rehabilitation Services is transferred to the Department of Commerce Workforce Services created in §5F-1-1 et seq. of this code. The secretary shall appoint any board, commission, or council over the division to the extent required by federal law to qualify for federal funds for providing rehabilitation services for disabled persons. The secretary and the boards, commissions or councils as he or she is required by federal law to appoint are authorized and directed to cooperate with the federal government to the fullest extent in an effort to provide rehabilitation services for disabled persons.(b) References in this article or §18-10B-1 et seq. of this code to the state Board of Vocational Education, the state Board of Rehabilitation or the state board as the governing board of vocational or other rehabilitation services or facilities mean the Secretary of Commerce Workforce Services. All references in the code to the Division of Vocational Rehabilitation mean the Division of Rehabilitation Services and all references to the Director of the Division of Vocational Rehabilitation means the Director of the Division of Rehabilitation Services. CHAPTER 21B. DEPARTMENT OF WORKFORCE SERVICES. article 1. creation of department; powers and duties; transfer of existing agencies; transition; eligibility; compliance; conforming references. §21B-1-1. Creation of Department; Secretary. The Department of Workforce Services is hereby created. The Secretary shall be the chief executive officer and shall be appointed by the Governor with the advice and consent of the Senate. §21B-1-2. Powers and Duties of the Secretary. The Secretary shall direct and manage the department to provide a unified system of workforce development, vocational rehabilitation, and economic assistance, and is authorized to enter into contracts and grants with federal and state agencies. §21B-1-3. Transfer of Existing Agencies and Programs. Effective July 1, 2027, the following are transferred to the Department of Workforce Services: (1) WorkForce West Virginia; (2) The Division of Rehabilitation Services, including the VR program and Disability Determination Section; (3) The Bureau for Family Assistance (SNAP and TANF); (4) Administration of Medicaid eligibility and work requirements; (5) The Office of Adult Education; and (6) The West Virginia Workforce Development Board. §21B-1-4. Transition; Transfer of Records, Property, and Personnel. (a) To ensure an orderly transition by July 1, 2027, the Secretary shall coordinate the transfer of all records, assets, and personnel. (b) Any employee transferred shall retain their current pay grade, benefits, and seniority. §21B-1-5. Integrated Eligibility and Work Tracking System. (a) The Secretary shall maintain a unified electronic system to track eligibility and work-requirement compliance for SNAP, TANF, and Medicaid simultaneously. (b) Verification of qualifying hours submitted to any division shall be applied automatically to all assistance programs. §21B-1-6. Federal Compliance. The Department is designated as the successor agency for all federal grants and state plans relating to the transferred programs, ensuring no lapse in federal funding under the Rehabilitation Act of 1973 or the Social Security Act. §21B-1-7. Conforming References. Wherever in this code, specifically including Chapter 21A, reference is made to the “Bureau of Employment Programs” or “WorkForce West Virginia,” it shall be construed to mean the Department of Workforce Services created by this chapter. Wherever reference is made to the 'Commissioner of WorkForce West Virginia,' it shall be construed to mean the Secretary of the Department of Workforce Services. article 2. west virginia workforce development board; single region designation; waivers. §21B-2-1. West Virginia Workforce Development Board; membership of board; duties of Board; staffing of the Board. (a) The West Virginia Workforce Development Board is hereby created and shall serve as the state’s Workforce Development Board, as required by the WIOA. The board shall make general recommendations regarding workforce investment in the state to the Governor and the Legislature. (b) The membership of the board shall meet the requirements of WIOA §101(b) and represent diverse geographic areas of the state, including urban, rural and suburban areas.(c) The board shall conduct such duties as required by WIOA §101(d), including assisting the Governor with oversight and performance of the state workforce system. The board may develop and implement and performance metrics that provide accountability and guide the work of the department.(d) The department shall provide staff support to the board to ensure the board can carry out its duties under WIOA and state law. §21B-2-2. West Virginia single region designation; service delivery. The Legislature designates West Virginia as a single region encompassing the entire state consistent with provisions in WIOA. As a single region, it is the Legislature’s intent that West Virginia provide services as a single state area with the operations of any comprehensive or affiliate one-stop centers being conducted by the department. §21B-2-3. West Virginia waivers. The Legislature encourages the Governor and the department to pursue and submit any waivers of federal law and regulations such that services to West Virginia residents and businesses can be conducted in a more efficient and effective manner. Waivers that improve coordination between the department and other state agencies and commissions are also encouraged. article 3. work requirments; legal services. §21B-3-1. Work requirements; integration. (a) The Secretary of the Department of Workforce Services shall administer work requirements for SNAP and TANF in accordance with federal law. (b) Consolidated Job-Matching: Every individual subject to SNAP or TANF work requirements shall be automatically enrolled in the WorkForce West Virginia job-matching database. (c) Medicaid Work Requirements: Pursuant to the federal One Big Beautiful Bill Act of 2025, the department shall implement an 80-hour-per-month community engagement and work requirement for the Medicaid expansion population. (d) Automatic Exemption and Deemed Compliance: To prevent administrative duplication, any individual verified as meeting the work requirements for TANF or SNAP shall be deemed in automatic compliance with Medicaid work requirements. Individuals participating in full-time programs under the Division of Rehabilitation Services or the Office of Adult Education shall be automatically exempt from additional work-reporting requirements for the duration of active enrollment. §21B-3-2. Attorney general and prosecuting attorneys to render legal services to commissioner. The Attorney General of the state and his assistants, and the prosecuting attorneys of the various counties shall render to the commissioner, without additional compensation, such legal services as he shall require of them in the discharge of his duties. This section shall not be construed to prohibit the department from developing plans for cooperation with courts, prosecuting attorneys, and other law-enforcement officials in such a manner as to permit the state and its citizens to obtain maximum fiscal benefits under federal laws, rules and regulations.